District of Columbia statutes.
46-353.17

Communications between tribunals.

A tribunal of the District may communicate with a tribunal outside the District in a record or by telephone, electronic mail, or other means, to obtain information concerning the laws, the legal effect of a judgment, decree, or order of that tribunal, and the status of a proceeding. A tribunal of the District may furnish similar information by similar means to a tribunal outside the District.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 317, 63 DCR 222